Arkansas, session 2025, HB1317.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 5-55-301 is amended to read as follows:
5-55-301. Penalty — Notice — Prosecution.
(a)(1) It is unlawful for any a person to knowingly make any material
false statement or representation to the State Department for Social Security
Administration Disability Determination or a state supported retirement
system for the purpose of:
(A) Obtaining any a benefit or payment;
(B) Defeating or wrongfully increasing or wrongfully
decreasing any a claim for benefit or payment; or
(C) Aiding and abetting another person in violation of
subdivision (a)(1)(A) or subdivision (a)(1)(B) of this section.
(2) Upon conviction, a person who violates subdivision (a)(1) of
this section is guilty of a Class D felony.
*LJH051*
02-05-2025 09:23:11 LJH051

As Engrossed: H2/5/25 HB1317
(b) A copy of subsection (a) of this section shall be placed on all
forms prescribed by the State Department for Social Security Administration
Disability Determination department or a state supported retirement system
for the use of a person claiming a benefit, a provider participating in the
claims process, and any other party involved in the claims process.
(c) When the department finds a violation of subsection (a) of this
section, the Director of the State Department for Social Security
Administration Disability Determination shall refer the matter for
appropriate action to the prosecuting attorney of the district where the
original claim was filed.
(d) When a state supported retirement system finds a violation of
subsection (a) of this section, the Executive Director of the state supported
retirement system may refer the matter for investigation to:
(1) The Attorney General; or
(2) The Sixth Judicial District Prosecuting Attorney.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 24-4-102 is amended to read as follows:
24-4-102. Penalty.
Any A person who knowingly makes any a material false statements statement or
who materially falsifies or permits to be materially falsified any record in
an attempt to defraud the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System as the
result of such an act upon conviction shall be is guilty of a Class A
misdemeanor Class D felony in accordance with § 5-55-301.
SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 24-6-202 is amended to read as follows:
24-6-202. Penalty.
(a) Any A person who knowingly makes any a material false statements
statement or who materially falsifies or permits to be materially falsified
any records of the State Police Retirement System or the Division of Arkansas
State Police in an attempt to defraud the system as the result of that act
upon conviction shall be is guilty of a misdemeanor felony.
(b) Upon conviction by a court, that person shall be guilty of a Class
A misdemeanor Class D felony in accordance with § 5-55-301.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code Title 24, Chapter 8, Subchapter 2, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
24-8-230. Penalty.
02-05-2025 09:23:11 LJH051

As Engrossed: H2/5/25 HB1317
A person who knowingly makes a material false statement or who
materially falsifies or permits to be materially falsified any record in an
attempt to defraud the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System as the result of
such an act upon conviction is guilty of a Class D felony in accordance with
§ 5-55-301.

SECTION 5. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the provisions of the Arkansas
Code related to fraud against the government by making false statements and
falsifying a governmental record need urgent revision to include fraud
against a state supported retirement system; to increase the classification
of the felony in order to dissuade the fraudster from making false claims or
falsifying a governmental record to a state supported retirement system,
fraudulent acts whose purpose is to deprive the member or retiree from
retirement benefits and divert those benefits unlawfully to the fraudster;
and to protect and safeguard the members and beneficiaries of the state
supported retirement systems; that the revisions in this act are immediately
necessary in order to allow timely referral to the Attorney General or the
Sixth Judicial District Prosecuting Attorney so that they may criminally
charge the fraudster as appropriate when these cases may otherwise worsen
without said referral; and that this act is immediately necessary to preserve
public peace and protect the assets of a state supported retirement system
from criminal interference. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist,
and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public
peace, health, and safety shall become effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.

/s/M. Shepherd



02-05-2025 09:23:11 LJH051